sl-SI: Dišava: Vodni; Češnja; Cimet; Citrus; Evkaliptus; Cvetlična; Sveže; Sveže perilo; Sadna; Zeliščna; Jasmin; Sivka; Oceanski vetrič; Orientalska; Borovec; Vrtnica; Sandalovina; Pikantna; Jagoda; Čajevec; Brez vonja; Vanilija; Lesnata; Drugo
lt-LT: Kvapas: Vanduo; Vyšnios; Cinamonas; Citrusiniai vaisiai; Eukaliptas; Gėlės; Gaivūs; Švarūs skalbiniai; Vaisiniai; Žolelės; Jazminas; Levandos; Vandenyno vėjas; Rytietiški; Pušis; Rožės; Sandalmedis; Aštrūs; Braškės; Arbatmedis; Bekvapiai; Vanilė; Medienos; Kita
vi: Hương thơm: Biển; Anh đào; Quế; Cam quýt; Bạch đàn; Hoa cỏ; Tươi mới; Vải lanh mới; Mùi trái cây; Thảo mộc; Hoa nhài; Hoa oải hương; Gió biển; Thuốc lá Oriental; Thông; Hình hoa hồng; Gỗ đàn hương; Cay; Dâu tây; Cây chè; Không mùi; Vani; Mùi gỗ; Khác
it: Fragranza: Acquatica; Ciliegia; Cannella; Agrumi; Eucalipto; Floreale; Fresca; Biancheria pulita; Fruttata; A base di erbe; Gelsomino; Lavanda; Brezza dell'oceano; Orientale; Pino; Rosa; Sandalo; Speziato; Fragola; Tea tree; Inodore; Vaniglia; Legnosa; Altro
fi: Hajuste: Merellinen; Kirsikka; Kaneli; Sitrus; Eukalyptus; Kukikas; Tuore; Tuoreet liinavaatteet; Hedelmäinen; Yrttimäinen; Jasmiini; Laventeli; Merituuli; itämainen; Mänty; Ruusu; Santelipuu; Mausteinen; Mansikka; Tea tree; Hajusteeton; Vanilja; Puumainen; Muu
hr-HR: Miris: Vodenasti; Trešnja; Cimet; Citrus; Eukaliptus; Cvjetni; Svježi; Svježe oprana posteljina; Voćni; Biljni; Jasmin; Lavanda; Oceanski povjetarac; Orijentalni; Bor; Ruža; Sandalovina; Pikantni; Jagoda; Čajevac; Bez mirisa; Vanilija; Drvenasti; Ostalo
bg-BG: Аромат: Воден; Череша; Канела; Цитрус; Евкалипт; Флорален; Свеж; Свежо бельо; Плодов; Билков; Жасмин; Лавандула; Океански бриз; Ориенталски; Бор; Роза; Сандалово дърво; Пикантен; Ягода; Чаено дърво; Без аромат; Ванилия; Дървесен; Други
el: Άρωμα: Aquatic; Κεράσι; Κανέλα; Εσπεριδοειδές; Ευκάλυπτος; Φλοράλ; Φρέσκο; Φρεσκοπλυμένα λευκά είδη; Φρουτένιο; Βοτανικό; Γιασεμί; Λεβάντα; Αύρα του ωκεανού; Ανατολίτικο; Πεύκο; Τριαντάφυλλο; Σανταλόξυλο; Πικάντικο; Φράουλα; Τεϊόδενδρο; Μη αρωματισμένο; Βανίλια; Ξυλώδες; Άλλο
zh-CN: 香味: 水生; 樱桃; 肉桂; 柑橘类; 桉树; 花型; 新鲜; 清新衣香; 果香; 草药; 茉莉; 薰衣草; 海风; 东方; 松树; 玫瑰型; 檀香油; 辛辣; 草莓; 茶树; 无香; 香草; 木香; 其他
nl: Geur: Aquatisch; Kers; Kaneel; Citrus; Eucalyptus; Gebloemd; Vers; Fris beddengoed; Fruitig; Kruidig; Jasmijn; Lavendel; Zeebries; Oosters; Den; Rozenrood; Sandelhout; Pittig; Aardbei; Theeboom; Ongeparfumeerd; Vanille; Houtig; Andere
ru: Запах: Акватический; Вишневый; Коричный; Цитрусовый; Эвкалиптовый; Цветочный; Свежий; Свежее белье; Фруктовый; Травяной; Жасминовый; Лавандовый; Морской бриз; Восточный; Хвойный; Розовый; Сандаловый; Специевый; Клубничный; Чайный; Без запаха; Ванильный; Древесный; Другой
fr: Fragrance: Aquatique; Cerise; Cannelle; Agrume; Eucalyptus; Floral; Frais; Linge frais; Fruité; Végétal; Jasmin; Lavande; Brise de l’océan; Oriental; Pin; Pomme; Santal; Épicé; Fraise; Arbre de thé; Non parfumé; Vanille; Boisé; Autre
ko: 향: 아쿠아; 체리; 시나몬; 시트러스; 유칼립투스; 꽃; 신선; 새 침구; 과일향; 허브; 자스민; 라벤더; 바닷바람; 오리엔탈; 소나무; 장미; 백단향; 스파이스; 딸기; 티트리; 무향; 바닐라; 우디; 기타
en: Fragrance: Aquatic; Cherry; Cinnamon; Citrus; Eucalyptus; Floral; Fresh; Fresh linen; Fruity; Herbal; Jasmine; Lavender; Ocean breeze; Oriental; Pine; Rose; Sandalwood; Spicy; Strawberry; Tea tree; Unscented; Vanilla; Woody; Other
da: Duft: Akvatisk; Kirsebær; Kanel; Citrus; Eucalyptus; Blomster; Frisk; Frisk linned; Frugtagtig; Urter; Jasmin; Lavendel; Havbrise; Orientalsk; Fyrretræ; Rose; Sandeltræ; Krydret; Jordbær; Tea tree; Uparfumeret; Vanilje; Træagtig; Andet
th: น้ำหอม: น้ำ; เชอร์รี; อบเชย; ซิตรัส; ยูคาลิปตัส; ลายดอก; สด; เฟรชลินิน; ผลไม้; สมุนไพร; มะลิ; ลาเวนเดอร์; ลมทะเล; โอเรียนทอล; ต้นสน; กุหลาบ; ไม้จันทน์หอม; กลิ่น Spicy; สตรอว์เบอร์รี; ทีทรี; ไม่มีกลิ่น; วานิลลา; ไม้; อื่นๆ
tr: Koku: Su canlısı; Kiraz; Tarçın; Narenciye; Okaliptüs; Çiçek; Taze; Taze keten; Meyveli; Bitkisel; Yasemin; Lavanta; Okyanus esintisi; Şark; Çam; Gül; Sandal ağacı; Baharatlı; Çilek; Çay ağacı; Kokusuz; Vanilya; Odunsu; Diğer
pt-BR: Fragrância: Aquática; Cereja; Canela; Citrus; Eucalipto; Floral; Fresco; Linho fresco; Frutado; Ervas; Jasmim; Lavanda; Brisa do oceano; Oriental; Pinho; Rosa; Sândalo; Condimentado; Morango; Melaleuca; Sem cheiro; Baunilha; Amadeirado; Outro
nb: Duft: Akvatisk; Kirsebær; Kanel; Sitrus; Eukalyptus; Blomster; Fersk; Fersk lin; Fruktig; Urte; Jasmine; Lavendel; Havbris; Orientalsk; Furu; Rose; Sandeltre; Krydret; Jordbær; Tetreolje; Uparfymert; Vanilje; Treaktig; Annen
ja: フレグランス: アクア; チェリー; シナモン; シトラス; ユーカリ; フローラル; 生鮮; フレッシュリネン; フルーティー; ハーブ; ジャスミン; ラベンダー; オーシャンブリーズ; オリエンタル; 松; ローズ; サンダルウッド; スパイシー; いちご; ティーツリー; 無香; バニラ; ウッディ; その他
sv: Doft: Vatten; Körsbär; Kanel; Citrus; Eukalyptus; Blommig; Frisk; Nytt linne; Fruktig; Ört; Jasmine; Lavender; Havsbris; Orientalisk; Tall; Rosfärgad; Sandelträ; Kryddig; Jordgubbe; Tebuske; Oparfymerad; Vanilj; Vedartad; Annat
sk-SK: Vôňa: Vodný; Čerešňa; Škorica; Citrus; Eukalyptus; Kvetinový; Čerstvý; Čerstvá bielizeň; Ovocná; Bylinkový; Jazmín; Levanduľa; Oceánsky vánok; Orientálny; Borovica; Ruža; Santalové drevo; Pikantný; Jahoda; Čajový strom; Neparfumovaný; Vanilka; Drevený; Iné
zh-TW: 香氣: 水生調; 櫻桃; 肉桂; 柑橘類; 尤加利葉; 花卉; 清新; 清新亞麻; 果香調; 草本香調; 茉莉花; 薰衣草; 海洋微風; 東方種; 松木; 玫瑰; 檀香; 辛辣的; 草莓; 茶樹; 無味; 香草; 木質調; 其他
pl: Zapach: Wodne; Wiśnia; Cynamon; Cytrus; Eukaliptus; Kwiatowy; Świeży; Świeża pościel; Owocowy; Ziołowy; Jaśmin; Lawenda; Oceaniczna bryza; Oriental; Sosna; Róża; Sandałowiec; Pikantny; Truskawka; Drzewo herbaciane; Bezzapachowy; Wanilia; Drzewny; Pozostałe
es: Fragancia: Acuático; Cereza; Canela; Cítricos; Eucalipto; Floral; Fresco; Lino fresco; Frutal; De hierbas; Jazmín; Lavanda; Brisa marina; Oriental; Pino; Rosa; Sándalo; Especiada; Fresa; Árbol de té; Sin perfume; Vainilla; Amaderado; Otros
ro-RO: Parfum: Acvatic; Cireșe; Scorțișoară; Citrice; Eucalipt; Floral; Fresh; Lenjerie curată; Fructat; Plante; Iasomie; Lavandă; Briza oceanului; Oriental; Pin; Trandafir; Lemn de santal; Picant; Căpșuni; Arbore de ceai; Fără parfum; Vanilie; Lemnos; Altele
pt-PT: Fragrância: Aquático; Cereja; Canela; Citrinos; Eucalipto; Floral; Fresco; Linho fresco; Frutado; Herbal; Jasmim; Lavanda; Brisa do oceano; Oriental; Pinheiro; Rosa; Sândalo; Picante; Morango; Árvore do chá; Sem perfume; Baunilha; Amadeirado; Outro
de: Duftnote: Wasser; Kirsche; Zimt; Zitrus; Eukalyptus; Blumenmuster; Frisch; Frische Bettwäsche; Fruchtig; Kräuter; Jasmin; Lavendel; Meeresbrise; Orientalisch; Pinie; Rose; Sandelholz; Würzig; Erdbeere; Teebaum; Ohne Duftstoffe; Vanille; Holz; Sonstiges
cs: Vůně: Vodní; Třešeň; Skořice; Citrus; Eukalyptus; Květinový; Čerstvé; Čerstvé prádlo; Ovocná; Bylinná; Jasmín; Levandule; Vůně oceánu; Orientální; Borovice; Růžice; Santalové dřevo; Kořenité; Jahoda; Čajovník; Neparfemovaná; Vanilka; Dřevo; Jiné
hu: Illat: Vízi növény; Cseresznye; Fahéj; Citrus; Eukaliptusz; Virágos; Friss; Friss ruha; Gyümölcs; Gyógynövény; Jázmin; Levendula; Óceáni szellő; Keleties; Fenyő; Rózsa; Szantálfa; Fűszeres; Eper; Teafa; Illatmentes; Vanília; Erdei; Egyéb